Washington statutes.
RCW 18.240.030

Certification requirements.

The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who demonstrates that the following requirements have been met:

(1) Successful completion of a training program approved by the secretary that includes three hundred hours of instruction in general animal massage techniques, kinesiology, anatomy, physiology, behavior, first aid care, and handling techniques as follows:

(a) For a certificate to practice animal massage on large animals, the three hundred hours of specialized instruction must be related to the performance of animal massage on large animals; and

(b) For a certificate to practice animal massage on small animals, the three hundred hours of specialized instruction must be related to the performance of animal massage on small animals; and

(2) Successful completion of a competency evaluation, approved by the secretary, in either large animal massage or small animal massage, or both.

[ 2007 c 70 s 4.]